Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1885.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; BEAUTYWELL PROJECT.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the Beautywell Project for public awareness and education activities to address issues of colorism, skin-lightening products, and chemical exposures from skin-lightening products. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end